Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3409
Budget limitation; two or more proposals; how treated; placed on ballot.

If two or more proposals relating to the budget level of a political subdivision are placed upon the ballot at a general, primary, or special election and more than one such proposal receives a majority of affirmative votes, the proposal receiving the largest number of affirmative votes shall be considered the successful proposal.

Laws 1978, Spec. Sess., LB 2, § 9;

Laws 1981, LB 17, § 5.